Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 2 Officers of Armed Forces as Ex Officio Notaries

45-17-30.
Commissioned officers of armed services constituted as ex officio notaries; authority generally; effect of acts generally; no seal required.

All commissioned officers of all branches of the armed services of the United States of America are constituted ex officio notaries public of this state and as such are authorized, within and outside this state and within and outside the United States of America, to administer oaths, take acknowledgments, and attest instruments conveying or affecting property in Georgia. Acts performed by such officers as authorized in this Code section shall have the same effect as if performed within this state by notaries public of this state. A statement of his rank following the signature of any such officer shall be evidence of the fact of his rank and no seal shall be necessary.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 421, § 1.

45-17-31.
Persons authorized to have notarial acts performed by commissioned officers.

Any person who (1) is a member of the armed forces of the United States, (2) is serving as a merchant seaman outside the limits of the United States, or (3) is outside the limits of the United States by permission, assignment, or direction of any department or official of the United States government in connection with any activity pertaining to the prosecution of any war in which the United States is then engaged and the spouse, dependent child, or other dependent of such person may have instruments acknowledged, documents attested, oaths and affirmations administered, depositions and affidavits executed, and other notarial acts performed by any commissioned officer in active service of the armed forces of the United States.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 360, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 504, § 1.

45-17-32.
Validity and effect of notarial acts.

The notarial acts authorized by Code Section 45-17-31 are declared legal, valid, and binding; and instruments, documents, oaths, affirmations, depositions, and affidavits acknowledged, authenticated, or sworn to shall be admissible in evidence and eligible to record in this state under the same circumstances and with the same force and effect as if they had been made or taken within this state before a duly qualified officer or official.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 360, § 1.

45-17-33.
Sufficiency of certification generally; effect of failure to state place of execution or acknowledgment.

In the taking of acknowledgments and the performing of other notarial acts requiring certification, a certificate endorsed upon or attached to the instrument or document, which certificate shows the date of the notarial act and which states, in substance, that the person appearing before the officer acknowledged the instrument as his act or made or signed the instrument or document under oath, shall be sufficient for all intents and purposes. The instrument or document shall not be rendered invalid by the failure to state the place of execution or acknowledgment.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 360, § 1.

45-17-34.
Signature, rank, and branch of officer as proof of authority; action by officer as prima-facie evidence.

If the signature, rank, and branch of service, or subdivision thereof, of any commissioned officer provided for in Code Section 45-17-30 appears upon any instrument, document, or certificate, no further proof of the authority of such officer so to act shall be required; and such action by such commissioned officer shall be prima-facie evidence that the person making such oath or acknowledgment is within the purview of Code Sections 45-17-30 through 45-17-33 and this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 360, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45.